North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-10.2 Uniform Limited Partnership Act
45-10.2-111.
Secretary of state — Powers — Enforcement — Penalty — Appeal.

The secretary of state shall administer this chapter.

The secretary of state may propound to any limited partnership or foreign limited partnership subject to this chapter and to any partner any interrogatory reasonably necessary and proper to ascertain whether the partnership has complied with this chapter.

Any interrogatory must be answered within thirty days after mailing or within any additional time fixed by the secretary of state. Every answer to the interrogatory must be full and complete and be made in writing and under oath.

If an interrogatory is directed:

To an individual, then the interrogatory must be answered by that individual;

To a domestic limited partnership, then the interrogatory must be answered by a managing partner; or

To a foreign limited partnership, then the interrogatory must be answered by a resident partner or, if no partner is a resident partner, a partner designated by the foreign limited partnership.

The secretary of state need not file any record to which an interrogatory relates until the interrogatory is answered, except if the answers disclose the record is not in conformity with this chapter.

The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general, for any action the attorney general determines appropriate, any interrogatory and answers that disclose a violation of this chapter.

Each general partner of a limited partnership or a resident partner or designated partner of a foreign limited partnership who fails or refuses within the time provided by this section to answer truthfully and fully every interrogatory propounded to that person by the secretary of state is guilty of an infraction.

Any interrogatory propounded by the secretary of state and the answers are not open to public inspection under section 44-04-18. The secretary of state may not disclose any fact or information obtained from an interrogatory except to the extent permitted by law or required for evidence in any criminal proceeding or other action by this state.

If the secretary of state rejects any record required by this chapter to be approved by the secretary of state before the record may be filed, then the secretary of state shall give written notice of the rejection to the person that delivered the record, specifying the reasons for rejection. Within thirty days after the service of the notice of denial, the limited partnership or the foreign limited partnership, as the case may be, may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of that court a petition setting forth a copy of the record sought to be filed and a copy of the written rejection of the record by the secretary of state. The court shall try the matter de novo. The court shall sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take any action the court determines proper.

If the secretary of state involuntarily dissolves a limited partnership pursuant to section 45-10.2-108 or if the secretary of state revokes the certificate of authority of any foreign limited partnership and if reinstatement as provided in section 45-10.2-108 was denied for any reason, then the limited partnership or the foreign limited partnership, as the case may be, may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of that court a petition including:

A copy of the certificate of limited partnership and a copy of the notice of dissolution given by the secretary of state; or

A copy of the certificate of authority of the foreign limited partnership and a copy of the notice of revocation given by the secretary of state.

If the court order sought is one for reinstatement of a limited partnership that has been dissolved as provided in subsection 5 of section 45-10.2-108, or for reinstatement of the certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership that has been revoked as provided in subsection 6 of section 45-10.2-108, then, together with any other actions the court deems proper, any such order which orders the reinstatement of the limited partnership or the reinstatement of the certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership shall require the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to:

File the most recent past-due annual report;

Pay the fees to the secretary of state for all past-due annual reports as provided in subsection 22 of section 45-10.2-109; and

Pay the reinstatement fee to the secretary of state as provided in subsection 22 of section 45-10.2-109.

The court shall try the matter de novo. The court shall sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take any action the court determines proper.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2009, ch. 106, § 68.

45-10.2-112.
Secretary of state — Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence.

All copies of records filed in accordance with this chapter, when certified by the secretary of state, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the facts stated.

A certificate by the secretary of state under the great seal of this state, as to the existence or nonexistence of the facts relating to limited partnerships or foreign limited partnerships which would not appear from a certified copy of any of the foregoing records or certificates, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the existence or nonexistence of the facts stated.

Any certificate or certified copy issued by the secretary of state under this section may be created and disseminated as an electronic record with the same force and effect as if produced in a paper form.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2011, ch. 87, § 67.

45-10.2-113.
Secretary of state — Confidential records.

Any social security number or federal tax identification number disclosed or contained in any record filed with the secretary of state under this chapter is confidential. The secretary of state shall delete or obscure any social security number or federal tax identification number before a copy of any record is released to the public.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-114.
Secretary of state — Forms to be furnished by the secretary of state.

Every annual report must be made on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. Upon request, the secretary of state may furnish forms for all other records to be filed in the office of the secretary of state. However, the use of these records, unless otherwise specifically required by law, is not mandatory.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-115.
Audit reports and audit of limited partnerships receiving state subsidies for production of alcohol or methanol for combination with gasoline.

Any limited partnership or foreign limited partnership that produces agricultural ethyl alcohol or methanol within this state and which receives a production subsidy from the state, whether in the form of reduced taxes or otherwise, shall submit an annual audit report, prepared by a certified public accountant based on an audit of all records and accounts of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, to the legislative audit and fiscal review committee. The audit must be submitted within ninety days of the close of the taxable year of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership. Upon request of the legislative audit and fiscal review committee, the state auditor shall conduct an audit of the records and accounts of any limited partnership or foreign limited partnership required to submit an annual report under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-116. (1201)
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-117. (1203)
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act [15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq.] but this chapter does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 of that Act or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that Act.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

Note.

Sections 101 and 103(b) of the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, referred to in this section, are compiled at 15 USCS 7001 and 15 USCS 7003(b), respectively.